Washington statutes.
RCW 27.34.010

Purpose.

The legislature finds that those articles and properties which illustrate the history of the state of Washington should be maintained and preserved for the use and benefit of the people of the state. It is the purpose of this chapter to designate the two state historical societies as trustees of the state for these purposes, and to establish:

(1) A comprehensive and consistent statewide policy pertaining to archaeology, history, historic preservation, and other historical matters;

(2) Statewide coordination of historical programs; and

(3) A coordinated budget for all state historical agencies.

[ 1993 c 101 s 9; 1983 c 91 s 1.]

NOTES:

Findings—1993 c 101: "The legislature finds that:

(1) There is a strong community of interest between the Washington state historical society and the state capital historical association. This community of interest is expressed through many common goals, missions, and heritage programs, as well as a close geographic proximity between these two state historical agencies.

(2) The capacity to preserve our state's rich and diverse heritage and the unique political and cultural history of the state capital will be strengthened if the programs of both agencies are combined into a single, cohesive entity.

(3) In a time of limited state resources, operational efficiencies and savings can be achieved if the programs and personnel of both agencies are managed by a single entity.

It is, therefore, the purpose of this act to transfer the powers and duties of the state historical agency known as the state capital historical association to the Washington state historical society. However, it is the intent of the legislature that as the consolidation of these two agencies occurs, the unique missions and programs of the state capital historical association and the *state capital historical museum be preserved." [ 1993 c 101 s 1.]

*Reviser's note: The "state capital historical museum" was renamed the "historic Lord mansion" by 2017 c 117 s 2.